Massachusetts, session 194th, H336.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15B of chapter 186 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:-
(10) A lessor, or agent thereof, of a residential property shall not require the signing of a
lease more than three months in advance of the termination date of the current lease.
of 1